New Jersey, session 221, A3763.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall conduct a study and prepare a written report comparing online transactions processed by the commission through the commissions Internet website against transactions processed in-person at commission agencies.  The study shall examine, but not be limited to the: (1)   productive efficiency of each transaction processed through the commissions Internet website compared to the same transaction processed at each commission agency; (2)   operational throughput of transactions processed through the commissions Internet website compared to the same transactions processed at each commission agency; and (3)   marginal cost comparison for each transaction processed through the commissions Internet website compared to the same transaction processed at each commission agency. b.  Within six months of the effective date of this act, the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall submit a detailed written report of the studys findings to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. c.  For the purposes of this section, operational throughput means the number of transactions that the commission is able to process within a certain period of time. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon submission of the report required pursuant to subsection b. of section 1 of this act.